Louisiana, session 2026, SB231.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:600.35(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§600.35. Statewide blighted housing property list
* * *
C. The state housing agency shall utilize a statewide housing locator system
for the purpose of maintaining the blighted housing property list. The system shall
be updated as needed. The statewide housing locator system shall be made
available to the general public online through the state housing agency's
website.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-592 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 231